New Jersey, session 221, S1716.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    As used in this act: Chief Technology Officer means the person appointed by and serving at the pleasure of the Governor, pursuant to section 9 of P.L.2007, c.56 (C.52:18A-227), who is responsible for the day-to-day operations of the Office of Information Technology, in but not of the Department of the Treasury; Internet means the international computer network of both federal and non-federal interoperable packet switched data networks; State agency means any of the principal departments in the Executive Branch of State Government and any division, board, bureau, office, commission, or other instrumentality within or created by such principal department, and any independent State authority, commission, instrumentality, or agency; and State Treasurer means the Treasurer of the State of New Jersey. 2.    a. The State Treasurer, in consultation with the Chief Technology Officer, shall, on or before July 1, 2018, design and develop, maintain and operate a single, searchable Internet website with the capacity to retain and display data and information concerning State expenditures, including but not limited to purchases, contracts, or agreements and grants, awards, or loans, the cost or contract price of which is to be paid with or out of State funds by or on behalf of a State agency, pursuant to various provisions of State law. b.    The State expenditure website developed in accordance with subsection a. of this section shall, at a minimum, be:  (1) accessible through a link prominently displayed on the home page of the official website for the State of New Jersey; (2) available to the general public without charge for access; and (3) organized chronologically by State fiscal year, with additional consideration for type of expenditure and State agency involved with the expenditure of State funds.  The website shall provide opportunity for public comment regarding its utility and recommendations for its improvement. c.     Data and information made available on the State expenditure website may be updated or revised periodically, but shall not be subject to removal. d.    Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the State expenditure website shall not retain or display data or information deemed private or confidential by State or federal law, rules, or regulations. 3.    a.  The State Treasurer shall, for State fiscal years beginning on or after July 1, 2018, publish, on the State expenditure website developed in accordance with subsection a. of section 2 of P.L.    , c.    (C.       ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), notice of all purchases, contracts, or agreements and notice of all grants, awards, or loans, the cost or contract price of which is to be paid with or out of State funds by or on behalf of a State agency, pursuant to various provisions of State law. b.    The notice of a purchase, contract, or agreement published in accordance with subsection a. of this section shall, at a minimum, include: (1) the name and address of the entity contracting with the State; (2) the names of the principal officers and directors of the entity and, if the contracting entity is a subsidiary of another entity, the name and address of the parent entity and the names of its principal officers and directors; (3) a description of the goods and services provided; (4) the cost or price; (5) the beginning and termination dates; and (6) the State fund from which the contract is to be paid. c.     The notice of a grant, award, or loan published in accordance with subsection a. of this section shall, at a minimum, include: (1) the name and address of the entity receiving a grant from the State; (2) the names of the principal officers and directors of the entity and, if the entity receiving the grant is a subsidiary of another entity, the name and address of the parent entity and the names of its principal officers and directors; (3) a statement indicating the purpose or intent of the grant; (4) the cost or price; (5) the date of the award; and (6) the State fund from which the grant is to be paid. 4.    The State Treasurer shall develop rules and regulations, pursuant to the provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), as are necessary to effectuate the purposes of this act. 5.    This act shall take effect immediately.